Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Dedication of Roads, Streets or Highways

178.400.
Definitions for KRS 178.405 to 178.425.

As used in KRS

178.405

to

178.425

, “general public” means any person in addition to an owner, agent, or tenant of property that abuts any road, street, or highway.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 272, § 1.

178.405.
Conditions requisite.

When any private road, street, or highway in an unincorporated area in any county has been used by the general public openly, continuously, and notoriously for a period of at least fifteen (15) years, it shall be implied that such road, street, or highway may be dedicated to public use; Provided, that fifty-five percent (55%) of all property owners abutting the private road, street, or highway sign a petition stating that they are willing to dedicate the road, street, or highway to public use.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 272, § 2; 2002, ch. 346, § 190, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 61, § 9, effective July 13, 2004.

178.410.
Fiscal court determination.

Upon application by any person or corporation, public or private, the fiscal court shall determine whether the conditions of KRS

178.405

have been satisfied. If the court’s determination is in the affirmative, it shall notify the county works department and other appropriate agencies or departments that the road, street, or highway has been dedicated to public use.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 272, § 3.

178.415.
Fee simple title in county — Minimum width.

When the fiscal court has made a determination in accordance with the provisions of KRS

178.410

that the road, street, or highway has been dedicated to public use, the county shall have a fee simple title to the part of the road, street, or highway which the plat, filed in the office of the county clerk, indicates as being for street purposes. However, if the road, street, or highway is dedicated in accordance with the provisions of KRS

178.405

, and a plat does not exist, then the fiscal court shall establish a thirty (30) foot minimum width as a condition precedent to dedication to public use, unless the fiscal court finds that a thirty (30) foot minimum cannot be met due to the topography of the road or other extraordinary circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 272, § 4; 1978, ch. 384, § 314, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 61, § 10, effective July 13, 2004.

178.420.
Maintenance by county works department.

The county works department shall maintain a road, street, or highway which it has acquired pursuant to the provisions of KRS

178.405

to

178.425

in the same manner as it maintains any other county road.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 272, § 5.

178.425.
Applicability to dead-end passways.

The provisions of KRS

178.405

to

178.425

do not apply to any private road, street, or highway while it exists as a dead-end passway with less than four (4) platted lots or with less than four (4) lots that are not platted. At the time such passway is no longer a dead-end passway, the provisions of KRS

178.405

to

178.425

shall become applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 272, § 6.